Washington statutes.
RCW 18.83.105

Certificates of qualification. (Effective until October 1, 2025.)

The board may issue certificates of qualification with appropriate title to applicants who meet all the licensing requirements except the possession of the degree of Doctor of Philosophy or its equivalent in psychology from an accredited educational institution. These certificates of qualification certify that the holder has been examined by the board and is deemed competent to perform certain functions within the practice of psychology under the periodic direct supervision of a psychologist licensed by the board. Such functions will be specified on the certificate issued by the board. Such applicant shall comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees determined under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280. Upon petition by a holder the board of examiners may grant authority to function without immediate supervision.

[ 1996 c 191 s 69; 1991 c 3 s 201; 1985 c 7 s 67; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 75; 1965 c 70 s 22.]

PDFRCW 18.83.105

Licensed psychological associate license—Mandatory supervision. (Effective October 1, 2025.)

(1) The board shall issue a licensed psychological associate license to an applicant who:

(a) Is:

(i) Currently enrolled in a doctor of philosophy, doctor of psychology program, or its equivalent in psychology at an accredited educational institution; or

(ii) Participating in a postdoctoral residency, postdoctoral fellowship, or another supervised postdoctoral experience;

(b) Has been deemed competent by the director of clinical training or postdoctoral supervisor to practice psychology under the supervision of a licensed supervisor subject to rules adopted by the board; and

(c) Has complied with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees determined under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

(2)(a) A holder of a licensed psychological associate license may only practice under the supervision of a licensed supervisor pursuant to rules adopted by the board.

(b) An applicant for a licensed psychological associate license under this section may practice without a license under the direct supervision of a licensed supervisor for 120 days after the department receives the applicant's completed application or the applicant's license is issued or denied, whichever is sooner.

[ 2024 c 371 s 5; 1996 c 191 s 69; 1991 c 3 s 201; 1985 c 7 s 67; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 75; 1965 c 70 s 22.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2024 c 371 ss 1-12, 14, and 16: See note following RCW 18.19.020.

Rule making—2024 c 371 ss 1-16: See note following RCW 18.83.020.